South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H3114.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Article 1, Chapter 3, Title 20 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Section 20-3-15. A party may provide corroborating evidence by affidavit in support of a divorce on the grounds set forth in Section 20-3-10(5), where (i) the parties have resolved all issues, (ii) there are no issues other than the grounds of the divorce itself to be adjudicated, or (iii) the adverse party has been personally served with the complaint and has failed to file a responsive pleading or to make an appearance as required by law. The court may accept an affidavit from a witness setting forth facts sufficient to corroborate the grounds for divorce. The affidavit must include all facts necessary for the court to make all necessary findings of fact to conclude that a divorce should be granted. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----